src/fst/url.lexc
! An attempt at writing a lexc grammar for URL's

Multichar_Symbols

a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
%0 1 2 3 4 5 5 6 7 8 9
%  %# %: %; %! %< %> %% %"
/ . _ ( ) & = ? @ ~ - #

! Non-ascii symbols used in un-punified top domain names:
ö
! Greek:
ε λ υ
! Cyrillic:
а б в г д е з и й к л м н о р с т у ф ю қ
! Armenian:
ա հ յ
! Hebrew:
 א ו י ל ם ק ר ש
! Arabic:
 ئ ا ب ة ت ث ج ح د ر ز س ش ص ط ظ ع غ ف ق ك ل م ن ه و ي پ ڀ ک ھ ی 
! Devanagari:
ं क ग ट ठ त न भ म र स ा े ॉ ो ् सं रो म् कॉ ने भा 
! Bengali:
 ং ত ব ভ র ল া ৰ ভা বাং লা
! Gurmukhi:
ਤ ਭ ਰ ਾ ਭਾ
! Gujarati:
ત ભ ર ા ભા
! Oriya:
ତ ଭ ର ା ଭା
! Tamil:
இ க ங ச த ந ப ய ர ல ா ி ூ ை ் சி ங் ப் பூ ர் கை ந் தி யா
! Telugu:
త భ ర ా ్ త్ భా
! Kannada:
ತ ಭ ರ ಾ ಭಾ
! Malayalam:
 ം ത ഭ ര ാ ഭാ തം
! Sinhala:
 ං ක ල ා කා ලං
! Thai:
ค ท ม ย อ ไ
! Lao:
ລ ວ າ
! Georgian:
გ ე
! Hiragana:
な み ん
! Katakana:
ァ ア イ ウ ク グ コ シ ス セ ゾ ッ ト ド フ ポ マ ム ョ ラ ル ン ー 
! CJK ideographs:
世 业 东 中 主 乐 亚 企 佛 你 信 健 八 公 利 加 务 动 博 卦 厅 台 司 品 商 善
嘉 团 国 國 在 址 坡 城 大 天 娱 家 尚 山 广 店 府 康 微 息 慈 戏 我 手 拉 招
拿 政 教 文 新 时 書 机 构 标 格 歌 浦 淡 港 游 湾 澳 灣 点 爱 物 界 盈 益 看
科 移 站 籍 线 组 织 络 网 联 聘 訊 谷 販 购 逊 通 酒 里 锡 門 闻 集 電 飞 食
餐 香 马 국 넷 닷 삼 성 컴 한

{hash} ! Analysis side symbol for # when used in URL's of the type:
!
! http://www.nb.no/nbsok/nb/ac3087f9a76b505c8f8adc7f6f823c6c.nbdigital?lang=no#47
!
! This is done to avoid sub-reading analyses of such strings in hfst-tokenise.

 +URL !!≈ The tag used

LEXICON Root
    protocol ;
    userdomain ;

LEXICON protocol
 http     protocolend ;
 https    protocolend ;
 ftp      protocolend ;
 mailto mtprotocolend ;
 afs      protocolend ;
 news     protocolend ;
 wais     protocolend ;
 prospero protocolend ;

! Initial upper case (not part of the standard, but found in text):
 Http     protocolend ;
 Https    protocolend ;
 Ftp      protocolend ;
 Mailto mtprotocolend ;
 Afs      protocolend ;
 News     protocolend ;
 Wais     protocolend ;
 Prospero protocolend ;

LEXICON protocolend
    %:// userdomain ;

LEXICON mtprotocolend
    %:   user ;

LEXICON userdomain
    user ;
    domain ;

! The user.name part of http://user.name@www.domain.com/file/here.doc
LEXICON user
    < [ a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | i | j | k
      | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s | t | u | v
      | w | x | y | z | A | B | C | D | E | F | G
      | H | I | J | K | L | M | N | O | P | Q | R
      | S | T | U | V | W | X | Y | Z |%. |%:
      |%- |%_
      |%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ]^>1 > userend;

! The @ part of http://user.name@www.domain.com/file/here.doc
LEXICON userend
  %@   domain ; ! @ ! - to reset syntax colouring
 (at)  domain ; ! obfuscation
 .at.  domain ; ! obfuscation
% at%  domain ; ! obfuscation

LEXICON domain
 predomain  ;
 realdomain ;
 numericdomain_ipv4 ;

! The www. part of http://user.name@www.domain.com/file/here.doc
! A . is allowed as part of the predomain to handle domains with more than three
! parts, e.g. www.bbc.co.uk - www.bbc. is predomain, co. is realdomain, and
! uk is topdomain.
LEXICON predomain
    < [ a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | i | j | k
      | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s | t | u | v
      | w | x | y | z
      | A | B | C | D | E | F | G | H | I | J | K
      | L | M | N | O | P | Q | R | S | T | U | V
      | W | X | Y | Z
      |%: |%. |%- |%_
      |%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ]+ %. > realdomain ;

! We require that the domain name must be at least two letters or numbers -
! no full stop or other delimiter as the last two characters of the
! domain name. This will prevent strings like "Innst.O.nr" to be parsed
! as URL's.
!
! The domain. part of http://user.name@www.domain.com/file/here.doc
LEXICON realdomain
    < [ a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | i | j | k
      | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s | t | u | v
      | w | x | y | z | A | B | C | D | E | F | G
      | H | I | J | K | L | M | N | O | P | Q | R
      | S | T | U | V | W | X | Y | Z |%-
      |%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ]^>1 %. > topdomainlist ;

LEXICON numericdomain_ipv4
 < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|"0"]^{0,2}
%. [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|"0"]^{0,2}
%. [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|"0"]^{0,2}
%. [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|"0"]^{0,2} > enddomain ;

LEXICON enddomain
    path   ;
    endlex ;

LEXICON path
 / endlex      ;
 / pathcontent ;

! The file/here.doc part of http://user.name@www.domain.com/file/here.doc
LEXICON pathcontent
    < [ a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | i | j | k
      | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s | t | u | v
      | w | x | y | z | A | B | C | D | E | F | G
      | H | I | J | K | L | M | N | O | P | Q | R
      | S | T | U | V | W | X | Y | Z |%/ |%_ | "{hash}":%#
      |%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 |%-
      |%_ |%? |%& |%= |%% |%@ |%. |%/ |%~ ]^>1 > endlex ;

! @ reset sntx clr

! The tag, and then END.
LEXICON endlex
 +URL: # ;

LEXICON topdomainlist
 edu                enddomain ;
 ac                 enddomain ;
 ag                 enddomain ;
 ao                 enddomain ;
 at                 enddomain ;
 az                 enddomain ;
 be                 enddomain ;
 bi                 enddomain ;
 bo                 enddomain ;
 bv                 enddomain ;
 ca                 enddomain ;
 cg                 enddomain ;
 cl                 enddomain ;
 cr                 enddomain ;
 cx                 enddomain ;
 dj                 enddomain ;
 dz                 enddomain ;
 er                 enddomain ;
 fi                 enddomain ;
 fo                 enddomain ;
 gd                 enddomain ;
 gh                 enddomain ;
 gn                 enddomain ;
 gs                 enddomain ;
 gy                 enddomain ;
 hr                 enddomain ;
 ie                 enddomain ;
 io                 enddomain ;
 it                 enddomain ;
 jp                 enddomain ;
 ki                 enddomain ;
 kr                 enddomain ;
 la                 enddomain ;
 lk                 enddomain ;
 lu                 enddomain ;
 mc                 enddomain ;
 mh                 enddomain ;
 mn                 enddomain ;
 mr                 enddomain ;
 mv                 enddomain ;
 mz                 enddomain ;
 nf                 enddomain ;
 no                 enddomain ;
 nz                 enddomain ;
 pf                 enddomain ;
 pl                 enddomain ;
 ps                 enddomain ;
 qa                 enddomain ;
 ru                 enddomain ;
 sc                 enddomain ;
 sh                 enddomain ;
 sl                 enddomain ;
 sr                 enddomain ;
 sv                 enddomain ;
 tc                 enddomain ;
 th                 enddomain ;
 tt                 enddomain ;
 uy                 enddomain ;
 vu                 enddomain ;
 aaa                enddomain ;
 abudhabi           enddomain ;
 adult              enddomain ;
 aig                enddomain ;
 allstate           enddomain ;
 amfam              enddomain ;
 apartments         enddomain ;
 arpa               enddomain ;
 auction            enddomain ;
 aws                enddomain ;
 bar                enddomain ;
 bauhaus            enddomain ;
 beauty             enddomain ;
 bid                enddomain ;
 blockbuster        enddomain ;
 boehringer         enddomain ;
 bostik             enddomain ;
 broker             enddomain ;
 bzh                enddomain ;
 camp               enddomain ;
 care               enddomain ;
 cat                enddomain ;
 cern               enddomain ;
 cheap              enddomain ;
 citadel            enddomain ;
 clinique           enddomain ;
 college            enddomain ;
 comsec             enddomain ;
 coop               enddomain ;
 creditcard         enddomain ;
 cymru              enddomain ;
 day                enddomain ;
 dell               enddomain ;
 dev                enddomain ;
 discover           enddomain ;
 dot                enddomain ;
 dvr                enddomain ;
 emerck             enddomain ;
 erni               enddomain ;
 exposed            enddomain ;
 fan                enddomain ;
 ferrari            enddomain ;
 fire               enddomain ;
 flights            enddomain ;
 ford               enddomain ;
 frl                enddomain ;
 futbol             enddomain ;
 gap                enddomain ;
 george             enddomain ;
 global             enddomain ;
 goldpoint          enddomain ;
 grainger           enddomain ;
 guge               enddomain ;
 hbo                enddomain ;
 hermes             enddomain ;
 holiday            enddomain ;
 host               enddomain ;
 hughes             enddomain ;
 ifm                enddomain ;
 infiniti           enddomain ;
 international      enddomain ;
 itau               enddomain ;
 jio                enddomain ;
 jpmorgan           enddomain ;
 kfh                enddomain ;
 komatsu            enddomain ;
 lacaixa            enddomain ;
 latino             enddomain ;
 legal              enddomain ;
 lighting           enddomain ;
 living             enddomain ;
 london             enddomain ;
 lundbeck           enddomain ;
 management         enddomain ;
 mattel             enddomain ;
 memorial           enddomain ;
 mini               enddomain ;
 mobile             enddomain ;
 mormon             enddomain ;
 mtn                enddomain ;
 nba                enddomain ;
 news               enddomain ;
 nike               enddomain ;
 nowruz             enddomain ;
 office             enddomain ;
 onl                enddomain ;
 origins            enddomain ;
 pars               enddomain ;
 pharmacy           enddomain ;
 pics               enddomain ;
 pizza              enddomain ;
 poker              enddomain ;
 prod               enddomain ;
 pru                enddomain ;
 radio              enddomain ;
 rehab              enddomain ;
 repair             enddomain ;
 rich               enddomain ;
 rogers             enddomain ;
 saarland           enddomain ;
 sandvik            enddomain ;
 sbi                enddomain ;
 schwarz            enddomain ;
 select             enddomain ;
 shangrila          enddomain ;
 shouji             enddomain ;
 sky                enddomain ;
 softbank           enddomain ;
 spa                enddomain ;
 statebank          enddomain ;
 studio             enddomain ;
 surgery            enddomain ;
 talk               enddomain ;
 tci                enddomain ;
 teva               enddomain ;
 tires              enddomain ;
 tools              enddomain ;
 toys               enddomain ;
 trv                enddomain ;
 unicom             enddomain ;
 vegas              enddomain ;
 viking             enddomain ;
 vivo               enddomain ;
 wales              enddomain ;
 weatherchannel     enddomain ;
 weir               enddomain ;
 winners            enddomain ;
 wtf                enddomain ;
 xn--2scrj9c        enddomain ;
 xn--45br5cyl       enddomain ;
 xn--5su34j936bgsg  enddomain ;
 xn--80aswg         enddomain ;
 xn--b4w605ferd     enddomain ;
 xn--czr694b        enddomain ;
 xn--fct429k        enddomain ;
 xn--fpcrj9c3d      enddomain ;
 xn--h2brj9c        enddomain ;
 xn--j6w193g        enddomain ;
 xn--lgbbat1ad8j    enddomain ;
 xn--mgbai9azgqp6j  enddomain ;
 xn--mgbgu82a       enddomain ;
 xn--mxtq1m         enddomain ;
 xn--o3cw4h         enddomain ;
 xn--q9jyb4c        enddomain ;
 xn--ses554g        enddomain ;
 xn--vuq861b        enddomain ;
 xn--y9a3aq         enddomain ;
 yamaxun            enddomain ;
 zappos             enddomain ;
 佛山    enddomain ;
 在线    enddomain ;
 คอม    enddomain ;
 公司    enddomain ;
 онлайн  enddomain ;
 微博     enddomain ;
 சிங்கப்பூர்  enddomain ;
 新闻      enddomain ;
 谷歌      enddomain ;
 भारतम्    enddomain ;
 укр    enddomain ;
 мон    enddomain ;
 موريتانيا  enddomain ;
 السعودية  enddomain ;
 닷컴      enddomain ;
 健康     enddomain ;
 ລາວ      enddomain ;
 ਭਾਰਤ     enddomain ;
 企业      enddomain ;
 இந்தியா   enddomain ;
